Utah statutes.
41-4-6.   Accepting gratuity, unlawful thereafter to finance sales.

It shall be unlawful for any person who hereafter so accepts or receives, either directly or indirectly, any payment, thing, or service of value, as set forth in Section 41-4-5, or hereafter so contracts, either directly or indirectly, to receive any such payment or thing or service of value to thereafter finance or attempt to finance the purchase or sale of any motor vehicle or buy or attempt to buy any conditional sales contracts, chattel mortgages or leases on motor vehicles sold at retail in this state.



No Change Since 1953

